Illinois, session 104th, HB3954.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The sum of $6,495,517,664, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Common School 7Fund to the Teachers' Retirement System of the State of 8Illinois for the State's contribution, as provided by law. 9    Section 5. The sum of $200,000, or so much thereof as may 10be necessary, is appropriated from the Education Assistance 11Fund to the Teachers' Retirement System of the State of 12Illinois for additional costs due to the establishment of 13minimum retirement allowances pursuant to Sections 16-136.2 14and 16-136.3 of the Illinois Pension Code. 15    Section 10. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 16be necessary, is appropriated from the Common School Fund to 17the Teachers' Retirement System of the State of Illinois for 18the employer contributions required by the State as an 19employer of teachers described under subsection (e) or 20subsection (f) of Section 16-158 of the Illinois Pension Code.   HB3954- 2 -OMB104 00155 VOT 10155 b1    Section 15. The amount of $123,195,074, or so much thereof 2as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 3Fund to the Teachers' Retirement System of the State of 4Illinois for deposit into the Teacher Health Insurance 5Security Fund as the State's contribution for teachers' health 6insurance. 7    Section 20. The amount of $16,256,000, or so much thereof 8as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Common School 9Fund to the Public School Teachers' Pension and Retirement 10Fund of Chicago for the State's contribution pursuant to 11subsection (c) of Section 17-127 of the Illinois Pension Code. 12    Section 25. The amount of $346,838,000, or so much thereof 13as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Common School 14Fund to the Public School Teachers' Pension and Retirement 15Fund of Chicago for the State's contribution pursuant to 16paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of Section 17-127 of the 17Illinois Pension Code. 18    Section 30. The sum of $65,000,000, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 20Fund to the Teachers' Retirement System of the State of 21Illinois for additional State contributions associated with 22adjustments to the earnings limitation specified in subsection 23(b-5) of Section 1-160 of the Illinois Pension Code.   HB3954- 3 -OMB104 00155 VOT 10155 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 22025.